Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.217

License or endorsement required for cremation, alkaline hydrolysis, and natural organic reduction—Penalty.

(1) A license or endorsement issued under this chapter or chapter 68.05 RCW is required in order to operate a crematory, alkaline hydrolysis, or natural organic reduction facility or conduct a cremation, alkaline hydrolysis, or natural organic reduction.

(2) Conducting a final disposition without a license or endorsement is a misdemeanor. Each such action is a separate violation.

[ 2019 c 432 s 38; 2009 c 102 s 4; 2005 c 365 s 18; 2003 c 53 s 128; 1985 c 402 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 432: See note following RCW 68.05.175.

Funeral directors and embalmers account and cemetery account abolished, moneys transferred to funeral and cemetery account—2009 c 102: See note following RCW 18.39.810.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Legislative finding—1985 c 402: See note following RCW 68.50.185.